Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 10. Petroleum Storage Tank Fund.

§ 62.1-44.34:10.
Definitions.

The following terms as used in this article shall have the meanings ascribed to them:

“Aboveground storage tanks”
means any one or combination of tanks, including pipes used to contain an accumulation of oil at atmospheric pressure, and the volume of which, including the volume of the pipes, is more than ninety percent above the surface of the ground. This term does not include (i) line pipe and breakout tanks of an interstate pipeline regulated under the Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979 or the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, as amended, and (ii) flow through process equipment used in processing or treating oil by physical, biological, or chemical means.

“Facility”
means any development or installation within the Commonwealth that deals in, stores or handles oil, and includes aboveground storage tanks. This term does not include underground storage tanks or pipelines.

“Fund”
means the Virginia Petroleum Storage Tank Fund.

“Oil”
means oil of any kind and in any form, including, but not limited to, petroleum and petroleum by-products, fuel oil, lubricating oils, sludge, oil refuse, oil mixed with other wastes, crude oils and all other liquid hydrocarbons regardless of specific gravity.

“Operator of a facility”
means any person who owns, operates, rents or otherwise exercises control over or responsibility for a facility.

“Operator of an underground storage tank”
means any person in control of, or having responsibility for, the daily operation of the underground storage tank.

“Owner of an underground storage tank”
means:

In the case of an underground storage tank in use or brought into use on or after November 8, 1984, any person who owns an underground storage tank used for the storage, use or dispensing of regulated substances; and

In the case of an underground storage tank in use before November 8, 1984, but no longer in use after that date, any person who owned such tank immediately before the discontinuation of its use.The term “owner” shall not include any person who, without participating in the management of an underground storage tank or being otherwise engaged in petroleum production, refining, and marketing, holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect the holder’s security interest in the tank.“Person” means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation, including a government corporation, partnership, association, any state or agency thereof, municipality, county, town, commission, political subdivision of a state, any interstate body, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity, the government of the United States or any unit or agency thereof.“Regulated substance” means an element, compound, mixture, solution, or substance that, when released into the environment, may present substantial danger to the public health or welfare, or the environment. The term “regulated substance” includes:

“Release”
means any spilling, leaking, emitting, discharging, escaping, leaching, or disposing from an underground storage tank or facility into ground water, surface water, or upon lands, subsurface soils or storm drain systems.

“Responsible person”
means any person who is an owner or operator of an underground storage tank or an aboveground storage tank at the time the release is reported to the Board.

“Underground storage tank”
means any one or combination of tanks, including connecting pipes, used to contain an accumulation of regulated substances, and the volume of which, including the volume of the underground connecting pipes, is ten percent or more beneath the surface of the ground. Exemptions from this definition include:

Septic tanks;

Pipeline facilities, including gathering lines, regulated under: (i) the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, (ii) the Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979, or (iii) any intrastate pipeline facility regulated under state laws comparable to the provisions of law in (i) or (ii) of this definition;

Surface impoundments, pits, ponds, or lagoons;

Storm water or waste water collection systems;

Flow-through process tanks;

Liquid traps or associated gathering lines directly related to oil or gas production and gathering operations; and

Storage tanks situated in an underground area, such as a basement, cellar, mineworking, drift, shaft, or tunnel if the storage tank is situated upon or above the surface of the floor.

1.

Any substance defined in § 101 (14) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, but not any substance regulated as a hazardous waste under Subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976; or

2.

Petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, which is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure (sixty degrees F and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute).

1.

Farm or residential tanks having a capacity of 1,100 gallons or less and used for storing motor fuel for noncommercial purposes;

2.

Tanks used for storing heating oil for consumption on the premises where stored;

History.

1987, c. 677; 1989, cc. 430, 627; 1992, c. 819; 1996, cc. 737, 979.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1987 act having been

62.1-44.34:8

.

§ 62.1-44.34:11.
Virginia Petroleum Storage Tank Fund.

The Virginia Petroleum Storage Tank Fund is hereby established as a nonlapsing revolving fund to be used by the Board for (i) administering the state regulatory programs authorized by Articles 9, 10 and 11 (§

62.1-44.34:8

et seq.) of this chapter, (ii) demonstrating financial responsibility, and (iii) other purposes as provided for by applicable provisions of state and federal law. All expenses, costs, civil penalties, charges and judgments recovered by or on behalf of the Board pursuant to Articles 9, 10 and 11 of this chapter, and all moneys received as reimbursement in accordance with applicable provisions of federal law and all fees collected pursuant to §§

62.1-44.34:19.1

and

62.1-44.34:21

, shall be deposited into the Fund. Interest earned on the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. No moneys shall be credited to the balance in the Fund until they have been received by the Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and any funds remaining in such Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.The Fund shall be administered by the Board consistent with the provisions of Subtitle I of the federal Solid Waste Disposal Act (P.L. 98-616, § 9001 et seq.) and any approved state underground storage tank program and in accordance with the following provisions:

The Fund shall be maintained in a separate account. An accounting of moneys received and disbursed shall be kept, and furnished upon request to the Governor or the General Assembly.

Disbursements from the Fund may be made only for the following purposes:

Reasonable and necessary per occurrence costs incurred for releases reported after December 22, 1989, by the owner or operator who is the responsible person, in taking corrective action for any release of petroleum into the environment from an underground storage tank which are in excess of the per occurrence financial responsibility requirement imposed in subsection B of §

62.1-44.34:12

, up to $1 million.

Reasonable and necessary per occurrence costs incurred for releases reported after December 22, 1989, by the owner or operator who is the responsible person for compensating third parties, including payment of judgments for bodily injury and property damage caused by the release of petroleum into the environment from an underground storage tank, which are in excess of the per occurrence financial responsibility requirement imposed by subsection B of §

62.1-44.34:12

, up to $1 million. The reasonableness and necessity of costs shall be determined based upon documented or actual damage, loss in value, and other relevant factors. Disbursements for third party claims shall be subordinate to disbursements for the corrective action costs in subdivision A 2 a of this section. Compensation for bodily injury and property damage shall be paid only in accordance with final court orders in cases which have been tried to final judgment no longer (i) subject to appeal, (ii) in accordance with final arbitration awards not subject to appeal, or (iii) where the Board approved the settlement of claim between the owner or operator and the third-party prior to execution by the parties.

Reasonable and necessary per occurrence costs incurred by an operator whose net annual profits from all facilities do not exceed $10 million for containment and cleanup of a release from a facility of a product subject to §

62.1-44.34:13

as follows: (i) for an operator of a facility with a storage capacity less than 25,000 gallons, per occurrence costs in excess of $2,500 up to $1 million; (ii) for an operator of a facility with a storage capacity from 25,000 gallons to 100,000 gallons, per occurrence costs in excess of $5,000 up to $1 million; (iii) for an operator of a facility with a storage capacity from 100,000 gallons to four million gallons, per occurrence costs in excess of $.05 per gallon of aboveground storage capacity up to $1 million; and (iv) for an operator of a facility with a storage capacity greater than four million gallons, per occurrence costs in excess of $200,000 up to $1 million. For purposes of this subdivision (2 c), the per occurrence financial responsibility requirements for an operator shall be based on the total storage capacity for the facility from which the discharge occurs.

Reasonable and necessary per occurrence costs incurred by an operator whose net annual profits from all facilities exceed $10 million for containment and cleanup of a release from a facility of a product subject to §

62.1-44.34:13

as follows: (i) for an operator of a facility with a storage capacity less than four million gallons, per occurrence costs in excess of $200,000 up to $1 million; (ii) for an operator of a facility with a storage capacity from four million gallons to 20 million gallons, per occurrence costs in excess of $.05 per gallon of aboveground storage capacity up to $1 million; and (iii) an operator of a facility with a storage capacity greater than 20 million gallons shall have no access to the Fund. For purposes of this subdivision, the per occurrence financial responsibility requirements for an operator shall be based on the total storage capacity for all facilities located within the Commonwealth.

Costs incurred by the Board in taking immediate corrective action to contain or mitigate the effects of any release of petroleum into the environment from an underground storage tank or from underground storage tanks exempted in subdivisions 1 and 2 of the definition of underground storage tank in §

62.1-44.34:10

, if such action is necessary, in the judgment of the Board, to protect human health and the environment.

Costs of corrective action up to $1 million for any release of petroleum into the environment from underground storage tanks or from underground storage tanks exempted in subdivisions 1 and 2 of the definition of underground storage tank in §

62.1-44.34:10

(i) whose owner or operator cannot be determined by the Board within 90 days; or (ii) whose owner or operator is incapable, in the judgment of the Board, of carrying out such corrective action properly.

Costs of corrective action incurred by the Board for any release of petroleum into the environment from underground storage tanks which are otherwise specifically listed in exemptions 1 through 9 of the definition of an underground storage tank in § 62.1-44.34:10.

Reasonable and necessary per occurrence costs of corrective action incurred for releases reported after December 22, 1989, by the owner or operator in excess of $500 up to $1 million for any release of petroleum into the environment from an underground storage tank exempted in subdivisions 1 and 2 of the definition of an underground storage tank in §

62.1-44.34:10

and aboveground storage tanks with a capacity of 5,000 gallons or less used for storing heating oil for consumption on the premises where stored.

The “cost share” of corrective action with respect to any release of petroleum into the environment from underground storage tanks undertaken under a cooperative agreement with the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency, as determined by the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency in accordance with the provisions of § 9003 (h) (7) (B) of the United States Public Law 98-616 (as amended in 1986 by United States Public Law 99-662).

Administrative costs incurred by the Board in carrying out the provisions of regulatory programs authorized by Articles 9, 10, and 11 (§

62.1-44.34:8

et seq.) of this chapter.

All costs and expenses, including but not limited to personnel, administrative, and equipment costs and expenses, directly incurred by the Board or by any other state agency acting at the direction of the Board, in and for the abatement, containment, removal and disposal of oil pursuant to Article 11 (§

62.1-44.34:14

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of this title.

Procurement, maintenance and replenishment of materials, equipment and supplies, in such quantities and at such locations as the Board may deem necessary, for the abatement, containment, removal and disposal of oil pursuant to Article 11 (§

62.1-44.34:14

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of this title.

Costs and expenses, incurred by the Board or by any other state agency, acting at the direction of the Board, for the protection, cleanup and rehabilitation of waterfowl, wildlife, shellfish beds and other natural resources, damaged or threatened by the discharge of oil, owned by the Commonwealth or held in trust by the Commonwealth for the benefit of its citizens.

Refund of cash deposits held in escrow pursuant to Article 11 (§ 62.1-44.34:14 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of this title and reasonable interest thereon, and refunds of fees collected pursuant to §

62.1-44.34:21

as authorized by this chapter.

Administrative costs incurred by the Department of Motor Vehicles in the collection of fees specified in § 62.1-44.34:13.

Reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the Virginia Department of Transportation in taking corrective action on property acquired for transportation purposes. If the costs of taking corrective action are recovered, in whole or in part, from any responsible party, the recovery shall be deposited to the Fund.

Reasonable and necessary per occurrence costs for releases reported after December 22, 1989, in taking corrective action for any release of petroleum into the environment from an underground storage tank, which are in excess of $5,000 up to $1 million, by any person who, without participating in the management of an underground storage tank or being otherwise engaged in petroleum production, refining, and marketing, holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect the holder’s security interest in the tank.

The Board shall seek recovery of moneys expended from the Fund for corrective action under this section where the owner or operator of an underground storage tank has violated substantive environmental protection rules and regulations pertaining to underground storage tanks which have been promulgated by the Board.

For costs incurred for corrective action as authorized in subdivision A 2 e of this section, the Board shall seek recovery of moneys from the owner or operator of an underground storage tank up to the minimum financial responsibility requirement imposed on the owner or operator in subsection B of §

62.1-44.34:12

if any, or seek recovery of such costs incurred from any available federal government funds.

For costs incurred for corrective action taken resulting from a release from underground storage tanks specified in subdivision A 2 f of this section, the Board shall seek recovery of moneys from the owner or operator up to the minimum financial responsibility requirement imposed on the owner or operator in subsection B of §

62.1-44.34:12

if any, or seek recovery of such costs incurred from any available federal government funds.

The Board shall seek recovery of moneys expended from the Fund for costs incurred for corrective action as authorized in subdivision A 2 g of this section or seek recovery of such costs incurred from any available federal government funds. However, the Board shall not seek recovery of moneys expended from the Fund for costs of corrective action in excess of $500 from the owner or operator of an underground tank exempted in subdivisions 1 and 2 of the definition of underground storage tank in §

62.1-44.34:10

and aboveground storage tanks with a capacity of 5,000 gallons or less used for storing heating oil for consumption on the premises where stored.

The Board shall have the right of subrogation for moneys expended from the Fund as compensation for personal injury, death or property damage against any person who is liable for such injury, death or damage.

The Board shall promptly initiate an action to recover all costs and expenses incurred by the Commonwealth for investigation, containment and cleanup of a discharge of oil or threat of discharge against any person liable for a discharge of oil as specified in Article 11 (§

62.1-44.34:14

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of this title; however, the Board shall seek recovery from an operator of expenditures from the Fund only in the amount by which such expenditures exceed the amount authorized to be disbursed to the operator under subdivisions A 2 through A 8 of this section.

3.

No funds shall be paid for reimbursement of costs incurred for corrective action taken prior to December 22, 1989, by an owner or operator of an underground storage tank, or an owner of an underground storage tank exempted in subdivisions 1 and 2 of the definition of an underground storage tank in §

62.1-44.34:10

, or an owner of an aboveground storage tank with a capacity of 5,000 gallons or less used for storing heating oil for consumption on the premises where stored.

4.

No funds shall be paid for reimbursement of costs incurred prior to January 1, 1992, by an operator of a facility for containment and cleanup of a release from a facility of a product subject to §

62.1-44.34:13

.

5.

No funds shall be paid for reimbursement of moneys expended for payment of interest or other finance charges on loans which were used for corrective action or containment and cleanup of a release by a person in subdivisions A 3 or A 4 of this section, except for an owner or operator which is exempt from taxation under § 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, provided that: (i) the loan moneys have been paid for corrective action that was pre-approved by the Board, (ii) any and all disbursements received from the Fund shall be paid against the loan or for interest and points, and (iii) the payment of interest and points under this subdivision shall be limited to five years from the date the release is reported to the Board. The Board may extend the period for payment of interest and points if, in the judgment of the Board, such action is necessary. The restrictions imposed in clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) shall not apply to loans made prior to June 1, 1992, to an owner or operator exempt from taxation under § 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

6.

No funds shall be paid for penalties, charges or fines imposed pursuant to any applicable local, state or federal law.

7.

No funds shall be paid for containment and cleanup costs that are reimbursed or are reimbursable from other applicable state or federal programs.

8.

No funds shall be paid if the operator of the facility has not complied with applicable statutes or regulations governing reporting, prevention, containment and cleanup of a discharge of oil.

9.

No funds shall be paid if the owner or operator of an underground storage tank or the operator of an aboveground storage tank facility fails to report a release of petroleum or a discharge of oil to the Board as required by applicable statutes, laws or regulations.

10.

No funds shall be paid from the Fund unless a reimbursement claim has been filed with the Board within two years from the date the Board issues a site remediation closure letter for that release or July 1, 2000, whichever date is later.

11.

The Fund balance shall be maintained at a level sufficient to ensure that the Fund can serve as a financial responsibility demonstration mechanism for the owners and operators of underground storage tanks. Any disbursements made by the Board pursuant to subdivision 2 of this subsection may be temporarily reduced or delayed, in whole or in part, if such action is necessary, in the judgment of the Board, to maintain the Fund balance.

History.

1987, c. 677; 1989, cc. 430, 627; 1990, cc. 580, 581, 582, 917; 1992, cc. 456, 819; 1993, cc. 20, 375; 1994, cc. 196, 535; 1996, cc. 737, 979; 1998, c. 87; 2004, c. 485.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1987 act having been

62.1-44.34:9

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1990, c. 598 enacted an Article 11 of this chapter, comprising
§§

62.1-44.34:14

through

62.1-44.34:18

. Acts
1990, c. 917 enacted a new chapter 3.1:1 of this title, also comprising
§§

62.1-44.34:14

through

62.1-44.34:18

. At the direction of the Code Commission, the sections added by c. 917 were codified as Article 11 of this chapter, comprising
§§ 62.1-44.34:14 through
62.1-44.34:18, and the sections added by c. 598 were codified as Article 12 of this chapter, comprising
§§

62.1-44.34:24

through

62.1-44.34:28

.

The federal Solid Waste Disposal Act (P.L. 98-616, § 9001 et seq.), referred to above, is codified as
42 U.S.C.S. § 6991 et seq., and “§ 9003 (h) (7) (B) of the United States Public Law 98-616” is codified as
42 U.SC.S. § 6991b(h)(7)(B).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 485, in subdivision A 2 b, inserted the present second sentence and added the last sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June, 1996, to June, 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 18; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 20, 33; 20 M.J. Water Companies and Waterworks, § 2; 3B M.J. Carriers, § 104; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 2, 30.

§ 62.1-44.34:12.
Financial responsibility.

The Board shall adopt regulations that conform to the federal financial responsibility requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 6991b(d) and any regulations adopted thereunder. Owners and operators of underground storage tanks shall annually demonstrate and maintain evidence of financial responsibility for taking corrective action and for compensating third parties for bodily injury and property damage in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board. Financial responsibility established in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board may be demonstrated by any combination of the following mechanisms: insurance, guarantee, surety bond, letter of credit, irrevocable trust fund, qualification as a self-insurer, or the Fund. The Fund may be used as a mechanism to demonstrate the portion of the federal financial responsibility requirements that are in excess of the state financial responsibility requirements contained in subsection B.

State requirements for owners and operators of underground storage tanks for maintaining evidence of financial responsibility for taking corrective action and for compensating third parties for bodily injury and property damage shall be as follows:

Owners and operators with 600,000 gallons or less of petroleum pumped on an annual basis into all underground storage tanks owned or operated, $5,000 per occurrence for taking corrective action and $15,000 per occurrence for compensating third parties, with an annual aggregate of $20,000;

Owners and operators with between 600,001 to 1,200,000 gallons of petroleum pumped on an annual basis into all underground storage tanks owned or operated, $10,000 per occurrence for taking corrective action and $30,000 per occurrence for compensating third parties, with an annual aggregate of $40,000;

Owners and operators with between 1,200,001 to 1,800,000 gallons of petroleum pumped on an annual basis into all underground storage tanks owned or operated, $20,000 per occurrence for taking corrective action and $60,000 per occurrence for compensating third parties, with an annual aggregate of $80,000;

Owners and operators with between 1,800,001 to 2,400,000 gallons of petroleum pumped on an annual basis into all underground storage tanks owned or operated, $30,000 per occurrence for taking corrective action and $120,000 per occurrence for compensating third parties, with an annual aggregate of $150,000;

Owners and operators with in excess of 2,400,000 gallons of petroleum pumped on an annual basis into all underground storage tanks owned or operated, $50,000 per occurrence for taking corrective action and $150,000 per occurrence for compensating third parties, with an annual aggregate of $200,000; and

Other owners and operators, $50,000 per occurrence for taking corrective action and $150,000 per occurrence for compensating third parties, with an annual aggregate of $200,000.

Any claim arising out of conduct for which evidence of financial responsibility must be provided under this section may be asserted directly against the person guaranteeing or providing evidence of financial responsibility. In such a case, the person against whom the claim is made shall be entitled to invoke all rights and defenses which would have been available to the owner or operator had such action been brought directly against the owner or operator.This section shall not limit any other state or federal statutory, contractual, or common law liability of the guarantor for bad faith in negotiating or in failing to negotiate the settlement of any claim. This section does not diminish the liability of any person under § 107 or § 111 of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, or other applicable law.The Board shall adopt regulations specifying compliance dates for the demonstration of financial responsibility required by this section, in accordance with the compliance dates established in federal regulations by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

Owners and operators of underground storage tanks who are unable to demonstrate financial responsibility in the minimum amounts specified in subsection B, and operators of facilities who are unable to demonstrate financial responsibility in amounts established pursuant to subsection D of §

62.1-44.34:16

, may establish an insurance pool in order to demonstrate such financial responsibility. Any contract establishing such an insurance pool shall provide:

For election by pool members of a governing authority for the pool, which may be a board of directors, a majority of whom shall be elected or appointed officials of pool members.

A financial plan setting forth in general terms:

The insurance coverages to be offered by the insurance pool, applicable deductible levels, and the maximum level of claims which the pool will self-insure;

The amount of cash reserves to be set aside for the payment of claims;

The amount of insurance to be purchased by the pool to provide coverage over and above the claims which are not to be satisfied directly from the pool’s resources; and

The amount, if any, of aggregate excess insurance coverage to be purchased and maintained in the event that the insurance pool’s resources are exhausted in a given fiscal period.

Such other provisions as are necessary or desirable for the operation of the pool.

The formation and operation of an insurance pool under this section shall be subject to approval by the State Corporation Commission which may, after notice and hearing, establish reasonable requirements and regulations for the approval and monitoring of such pools, including prior approval of pool administrators and provisions for periodic examinations of financial condition.The State Corporation Commission may disapprove an application for the formation of an insurance pool, and may suspend or withdraw such approval whenever it finds that such applicant or pool:

Has refused to submit its books, papers, accounts, or affairs to the reasonable inspection of the Commission or its representative;

Has refused, or its officers or agents have refused, to furnish satisfactory evidence of its financial and business standing or solvency;

Is insolvent, or is in such condition that its further transaction of business in this Commonwealth is hazardous to its members and creditors in this Commonwealth, and to the public;

Has refused or neglected to pay a valid final judgment against it within sixty days after its rendition;

Has violated any law of this Commonwealth or has violated or exceeded the powers granted by its members;

Has failed to pay any fees, taxes or charges imposed in this Commonwealth within sixty days after they are due and payable, or within sixty days after final disposition of any legal contest with respect to liability therefor; or

Has been found insolvent by a court of any other state, or by the Insurance Commissioner or other proper officer or agency of any other state, and has been prohibited from doing business in such state.

3.

A plan of management which provides for all of the following:

a.

The means of establishing the governing authority of the pool;

b.

The responsibility of the governing authority for fixing contributions to the pool, maintaining reserves, levying and collecting assessments for deficiencies, disposing of surpluses, and administration of the pool in the event of termination or insolvency;

c.

The basis upon which new members may be admitted to, and existing members may leave, the pool;

d.

The identification of funds and reserves by exposure areas; and

History.

1987, c. 677; 1989, c. 627; 1990, c. 581; 1992, c. 819; 1993, c. 375; 1996, c. 737; 1998, c. 87.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1987 act having been

62.1-44.34:10

.

Editor’s note.

The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980 is codified generally as 42 U.S.C.S. § 9601 et seq.

Acts 1998, c. 87, cl. 2 provides: “That the requirements to maintain evidence of financial responsibility established by Chapter 677 of the 1987 Acts of Assembly, as amended, and all relevant regulations adopted thereunder shall remain in effect until the regulations required by the new subsection A of §

62.1-44.34:12

of this act become effective.”

Law Review.

For survey on environmental law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 625 (1989).

§ 62.1-44.34:13.
Levy of fee for Fund maintenance.

In order to generate revenue for the Fund and to make the Fund available to owners and operators of underground storage tanks and to owners and operators of aboveground storage tanks, there shall be imposed a fee of one-fifth of one cent on each gallon of the following fuels sold and delivered or used in the Commonwealth: gasoline, aviation gasoline, diesel fuel (including dyed diesel fuel), blended fuel, and heating oil, as such terms are defined in §

58.1-2201

; however, such fee shall not be imposed on (i) gasoline, aviation gasoline, diesel fuel (including dyed diesel fuel), blended fuel, and heating oil sold and delivered to the United States or its departments, agencies and instrumentalities for the exclusive use by the United States or its departments, agencies and instrumentalities, (ii) alternative fuel as defined in §

58.1-2201

, or (iii) aviation jet fuel as defined in § 58.1-2201.

The fee shall be remitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles in the same manner and subject to the same provisions specified in Chapter 22 (§

58.1-2200

et seq.) of Title 58.1, except §

58.1-2236

shall not apply.

Any person who purchases gasoline, aviation gasoline, diesel fuel (including dyed diesel fuel), blended fuel, or heating oil upon which the fee imposed by this article has been paid shall be entitled to a refund for the amount of the fee paid if such person subsequently transports and delivers such fuel to another state, district or country for sale or use outside the Commonwealth. The application for refund shall be accompanied by a paid ticket or invoice covering the sales of such fuel and shall be filed with the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles within one year of the date of payment of the fee for which the refund is claimed. A refund shall not be granted pursuant to this article on any fuel which is transported and delivered outside the Commonwealth in the fuel supply tank of a highway vehicle or aircraft.

To maintain the Fund at an appropriate operating level, the Commissioner of the Department of Motor Vehicles shall increase the fee to three-fifths of one cent when notified by the Comptroller that the Fund has been or is likely in the near future to be reduced below three million dollars, exclusive of fees collected pursuant to §

62.1-44.34:21

, and he shall reinstitute the one-fifth of one cent fee when the Comptroller notifies him that the Fund has been restored to twelve million dollars exclusive of fees collected pursuant to §

62.1-44.34:21

.

The Comptroller shall report to the Commissioner quarterly regarding the Fund expenditures and Fund total for the preceding quarter.

Revenues from such fees, less refunds and administrative expenses, shall be deposited in the Fund and used for the purposes set forth in this article.

History.

1989, c. 627; 1992, c. 819; 1993, c. 422; 1995, c. 664; 1996, c. 737; 1998, c. 87; 1999, cc. 119, 124; 2000, cc. 729, 758.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c.c. 729 and 758, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations of the Department of Motor Vehicles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations promulgated under this act.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 729 and 758, effective January 1, 2001, are identical, and rewrote subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “Chapter 22 (§

58.1-2200

et seq.) of Title 58.1, except §

58.1-2236

” for “Article 4 (§ 58.1-2128 et seq.) of Chapter 21 of Title 58.1, except § 58.1-2129”; and in subsection C, substituted “gasoline, aviation gasoline, diesel fuel (including dyed diesel fuel), blended fuel” for “motor fuel, aviation motor fuel, dyed diesel fuel, diesel fuel” in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).